Florida, session 2026, HB1523.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1013.121, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1013.121 School food and plastic waste reduction.—
(1) The Department of Education shall develop a policy to
be adopted by 25 percent of school districts in this state by
the beginning of the 2027-2028 school year and to be adopted by
100 percent of school districts in this state by the beginning
of the 2029-2030 school year, which requires all of the
following:
(a) A partnership with a local nonprofit organization or
food bank to redistribute edible cafeteria food and divert
organic food waste to a composting program.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1523-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1523 2026
(b) Installation of a sorting system for cafeteria waste,
subject to legislative appropriation.
(c) Gradual elimination of single-use plastics by
replacing them with reusable or compostable alternatives,
subject to legislative appropriation.
(2) Each participating school district shall submit an
annual report to the department by the end of each school year
which includes all of the following:
(a) Total quantity by weight of cafeteria food donated.
(b) Total quantity by weight of organic food waste
diverted to a composting program.
(c) Total quantity of single-use plastic items eliminated.
(d) Cost savings realized by the school district.
(e) Any barriers encountered and recommendations for the
policy.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1523-00